Utah statutes.
64-13-30.7.   Use of funds for inmate postsecondary education and training.

Any ongoing funds provided to the State Board of Regent's Prison Recidivism Program beginning in fiscal year 2009-10 shall be transferred to the Prison Telephone Surcharge Account for establishing necessary program resources and promoting and providing inmate postsecondary education.

